Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-725
Character education; principles of instruction; duty of teachers.

Each teacher employed to give instruction in any public, private, parochial, or denominational school in the State of Nebraska shall arrange and present his or her instruction to give special emphasis to common honesty, morality, courtesy, obedience to law, respect for the national flag, the United States Constitution, and the Constitution of Nebraska, respect for parents and the home, the dignity and necessity of honest labor, and other lessons of a steadying influence which tend to promote and develop an upright and desirable citizenry.

Laws 1927, c. 85, § 1, p. 253;

C.S.1929, § 79-2131;

R.S.1943, § 79-2139;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 20, p. 699;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-214;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 399.